South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3192.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-20-50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (5) Each school district shall pay each certified special education teacher who is teaching special education courses in the district a full-time annual salary of at least $52,000 beginning with the 2026-2027 School Year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----